Utah statutes.
58-80-202.   Certification is voluntary.
(1)  The certification provided under this chapter is voluntary.
(2)  This chapter does not prohibit a person from acting as a medical language
interpreter, if the person does not have a certificate described in Subsection
58-80-201(1).
